Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1209.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1743.1-A. State certification. Beginning on the effective date of this section, a cyber charter school's professional staff members must hold appropriate State certification, including appropriate State certification in special education if the professional staff member is responsible for providing special education services to students enrolled in the cyber charter school.12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1209PN1357 - 2 - 1